Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.742

Agency management of print operations—Department rules and guidelines.

To improve the efficiency and minimize the costs of agency-based printing, the department shall establish rules and guidelines for all agencies to use in managing their printing operations, including both agency-based printing and those jobs that require the services of a print shop, as based on the successes of implementation of existing print management programs in state agencies. At a minimum, the rules and guidelines must implement managed print strategies to track, manage, and reduce agency-based printing.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 312.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.